Alabama, session 2026rs, HB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated the sum of
$460,000 from the Education Trust Fund to Southern Preparatory
Academy in Camp Hill, Alabama for the support and maintenance
of the educational program of the institution, for the fiscal
year ending September 30, 2027.
Section 2. The above appropriation is made for the
support of public education in Alabama and for the support and
maintenance of the above program. The appropriation shall be
subject to the provisions, terms, conditions, and limitations
of the Budget and Financial Control Act, Code of Alabama 1975,
Section 41-4-80 et seq.; the provisions of the Budget
Management Act of 1976, Code of Alabama 1975, Sections 41-19-1
et seq.; and any other provisions of this act.
Section 3. (a) Prior to the release of any funds
appropriated under this act, the following reports shall be
submitted:
Page 1

submitted:
HB242 Enrolled
(1) An operations plan for the fiscal year 2027,
including goals and measurable performance indicators, shall
be submitted to and approved by the Director of Finance, as
provided for state agencies in Code of Alabama 1975, Section
41-19-10.
(2) An audited financial statement for all operations
during the fiscal year 2025.
(b) It is the intent that funds appropriated for fiscal
year 2027 shall be released by the Director of Finance
following receipt of the above reports.
(c) In addition, quarterly reports shall be made to the
Director of Finance relating actual expenditures and
accomplishments to planned expenditures and accomplishments.
An end of year performance report for the fiscal year 2027
shall be made to the Director of Finance stating the work
accomplished and the services provided and the costs of
accomplishing the work and providing the services, citing
meaningful measures of program effectiveness and costs, as is
required for state agencies in Code of Alabama 1975, Section
41-19-11.
(d) The Director of Finance shall forward a copy of all
required reports to the Legislative Council in a timely
manner.
Section 4. This act shall become effective October 1, 2026.
Page 2

Section 4. This act shall become effective October 1, 2026.
HB242 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3